Utah statutes.
78B-12-206.   Income in excess of tables.

If the combined adjusted gross income exceeds the highest level specified in the table, an appropriate and just child support amount shall be ordered on a case-by-case basis, but the amount ordered may not be less than the highest level specified in the table for the number of children due support.

